Maryland, session 2026, HB0383.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Local Government
4–112.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO A BEACH IN THE STATE THAT IS OWNED
BY A MUNICIPALITY.
(B) A MUNICIPALITY MAY NOT LIMIT ACCESS TO THE AREA OF A BEACH
THAT IS ABOVE THE MEAN HIGH TIDE, AFFECTED BY THE REGULAR RISE AND FALL
OF THE TIDE, SOLELY TO RESIDENTS OF THE MUNICIPALITY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0383*